Idaho statutes. Title 39 HEALTH AND SAFETY
Chapter 1 ENVIRONMENTAL QUALITY — HEALTH
§ 39-107A. Real property in Bunker Hill cleanup site.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the department may accept transfer from the United States of any real property or interest in real property acquired by the United States for remediation purposes concerning any operable unit of the Bunker Hill Superfund Site pursuant to 42 U.S.C. section 9604(j). The state of Idaho shall incur no liability nor be subject to any claims related to the existence, release or threatened release of any hazardous substance or contaminant or pollutant on, or from, any such real property. The department may, in its sole discretion, manage, lease or dispose of such property for the purpose of facilitating appropriate operation and maintenance activities, encouraging economic development or assisting local governmental entities within the site. The management, lease or disposal of such property shall not be subject to chapter 3, title 58, Idaho Code. Any receipts from the management, lease or disposal of such property shall be deposited in the Bunker Hill Cleanup Trust Fund established by the Trust Fund Declaration of the state of Idaho dated May 2, 1994 (Attachment M, Consent Decree, United States of America v. Asarco, Inc. No. CV-94-0206-N-HLR (D. Idaho)) for the purpose of funding institutional control or operation and maintenance activities regarding the site.

§ 39-107B. Department of environmental quality fund.

There is hereby created a fund in the state treasury to be known as the department of environmental quality fund and all moneys deposited therein shall be available to be appropriated to the department of environmental quality for purposes for which the department was established.

All federal grants, fees for services, permitting fees, other program income and transfers from other funds subject to administration by the director of the department of environmental quality shall be placed in the fund provided that the statewide accounting and reporting system must provide for identification of the balance of each funding source within the fund.

The state controller shall make transfers to the fund from the general fund and any other funds appropriated to the department of environmental quality as requested by the director of the department and approved by the board of examiners.

§ 39-107C. Environmental protection trust fund established.

The director of the department of environmental quality may receive on behalf of the department any moneys or real or personal property donated, bequeathed, devised or conditionally granted to the department. Moneys received directly or derived from the sale of such property shall be held in a trust known as the environmental protection trust, which is hereby established, reserved, set aside, appropriated and made available until expended and used and administered to carry out the terms and conditions of such donation, bequest, devise or grant and to pay the costs and expenses arising from investment of the trust. There is hereby created in the state treasury a fund to be known as the “environmental protection trust fund,” which shall consist of moneys held in the environmental protection trust. Pending expenditure or use, surplus moneys in the environmental protection trust shall either be invested by the state treasurer in the manner provided for idle state moneys in the state treasury by section 67-1210, Idaho Code, or, in the alternative and with the concurrence of the director of the department, the state treasurer, and the endowment fund investment board, be invested with the endowment fund investment board pursuant to chapter 7, title 57, Idaho Code. Interest received on all such investments shall be paid into the environmental protection trust.

§ 39-107D. Rules of department or board.

The legislature directs that any rule formulated and recommended by the department to the board which is broader in scope or more stringent than federal law or regulations, or proposes to regulate an activity not regulated by the federal government, is subject to the following additional requirements: the notice of proposed rulemaking and rulemaking record requirements under chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code, must clearly specify that the proposed rule, or portions of the proposed rule, are broader in scope or more stringent than federal law or regulations, or regulate an activity not regulated by the federal government, and delineate which portions of the proposed rule are broader in scope or more stringent than federal law or regulations, or regulate an activity not regulated by the federal government.

To the degree that a department action is based on science, in proposing any rule or portions of any rule subject to this section, the department shall utilize:

The best available peer reviewed science and supporting studies conducted in accordance with sound and objective scientific practices; and

Data collected by accepted methods or best available methods if the reliability of the method and the nature of the decision justify use of the data.

Any proposed rule subject to this section which proposes a standard necessary to protect human health and the environment shall also include in the rulemaking record requirements under chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code, the following additional information:

Identification of each population or receptor addressed by an estimate of public health effects or environmental effects; and

Identification of the expected risk or central estimate of risk for the specific population or receptor; and

Identification of each appropriate upper bound or lower bound estimate of risk; and

Identification of each significant uncertainty identified in the process of the assessment of public health effects or environmental effects and any studies that would assist in resolving the uncertainty; and

Identification of studies known to the department that support, are directly relevant to, or fail to support any estimate of public health effects or environmental effects and the methodology used to reconcile inconsistencies in the data.

The department shall also include a summary of the information required by subsection (3) of this section in the notice of rulemaking required by chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code.

Any rule promulgated or adopted by the board which is broader in scope or more stringent than federal law or regulations, or which regulates an activity not regulated by the federal government, submitted to the standing committee of the legislature pursuant to section 67-5291, Idaho Code, shall include a notice by the board identifying the portions of the adopted rule that are broader in scope or more stringent than federal law or rules, or which regulate an activity not regulated by the federal government.
(6) Nothing provided herein is intended to alter the scope or effect of sections 39-105(3)(g)(v), 39-118B, 39-3601, 39-4404, 39-7210 and 39-7404, Idaho Code, or any other provision of state law which limits or prohibits agency action or rulemaking that is broader in scope or more stringent than federal law or regulations.

§ 39-108. Investigation — Inspection — Right of entry — Violation — Enforcement — Penalty — Injunctions.

The director shall cause investigations to be made upon receipt of information concerning an alleged violation of this act or of any rule, permit or order promulgated thereunder, and may cause to be made such other investigations as the director shall deem advisable.

For the purpose of enforcing any provision of this chapter or any rule authorized in this chapter, the director or the director’s designee shall have the authority to:

Conduct a program of continuing surveillance and of regular or periodic inspection of actual or potential environmental hazards, air contamination sources, water pollution sources and of solid waste disposal sites;

Enter at all reasonable times upon any private or public property, upon presentation of appropriate credentials, for the purpose of inspecting or investigating to ascertain possible violations of this act or of rules, permits or orders adopted and promulgated by the director or the board;

All inspections and investigations conducted under the authority of this chapter shall be performed in conformity with the prohibitions against unreasonable searches and seizures contained in the fourth amendment to the constitution of the United States and section 17, article I, of the constitution of the state of Idaho. The state shall not, under the authority granted by this chapter, conduct warrantless searches of private property in the absence of either consent from the property owner or occupier or exigent circumstances such as a public health or environmental emergency;

Any district court in and for the county in which the subject property is located is authorized to issue a search warrant to the director upon a showing of (i) probable cause to suspect a violation, or (ii) the existence of a reasonable program of inspection. Any search warrant issued under the authority of this chapter shall be limited in scope to the specific purposes for which it is issued and shall state with specificity the manner and the scope of the search authorized.

Whenever the director determines that any person is in violation of any provision of this act or any rule, permit or order issued or promulgated pursuant to this act, the director may commence either of the following:

Administrative enforcement action.

Notice. The director may commence an administrative enforcement action by issuing a written notice of violation. The notice of violation shall identify the alleged violation with specificity, shall specify each provision of the act, rule, regulation, permit or order which has been violated and shall state the amount of civil penalty claimed for each violation. The notice of violation shall inform the person to whom it is directed of an opportunity to confer with the director or the director’s designee in a compliance conference concerning the alleged violation. A written response may be required within fifteen (15) days of receipt of the notice of violation by the person to whom it is directed.

Scheduling compliance conference. If a recipient of a notice of violation contacts the department within fifteen (15) days of the receipt of the notice, the recipient shall be entitled to a compliance conference. The conference shall be held within twenty (20) days of the date of receipt of the notice, unless a later date is agreed upon between the parties. If a compliance conference is not requested, the director may proceed with a civil enforcement action as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(iii) Compliance conference. The compliance conference shall provide an opportunity for the recipient of a notice of violation to explain the circumstances of the alleged violation and, where appropriate, to present a proposal for remedying damage caused by the alleged violation and assuring future compliance.

Consent order. If the recipient and the director agree on a plan to remedy damage caused by the alleged violation and to assure future compliance, they may enter into a consent order formalizing their agreement. The consent order may include a provision providing for payment of any agreed civil penalty.

Effect of consent order. A consent order shall be effective immediately upon signing by both parties and shall preclude any civil enforcement action for the same alleged violation. If a party does not comply with the terms of the consent order, the director may seek and obtain, in any appropriate district court, specific performance of the consent order and such other relief as authorized in this chapter.

Failure to reach consent order. If the parties cannot reach agreement on a consent order within sixty (60) days after the receipt of the notice of violation or if the recipient does not request a compliance conference as per paragraph (a)(ii) of this subsection, the director may commence and prosecute a civil enforcement action in district court, in accordance with paragraph (b) of this subsection.

Civil enforcement action. The director may initiate a civil enforcement action through the attorney general as provided in section 39-109, Idaho Code. Civil enforcement actions shall be commenced and prosecuted in the district court in and for the county in which the alleged violation occurred and may be brought against any person who is alleged to have violated any provision of this act or any rule, permit or order which has become effective pursuant to this act. Such action may be brought to compel compliance with any provision of this act or with any rule, permit or order promulgated hereunder and for any relief or remedies authorized in this act. The director shall not be required to initiate or prosecute an administrative action before initiating a civil enforcement action.

No civil or administrative proceeding may be brought to recover for a violation of any provision of this chapter or a violation of any rule, permit or order issued or promulgated pursuant to this chapter more than two (2) years after the director had knowledge or ought reasonably to have had knowledge of the violation.

Monetary penalties.

Any person determined in a civil enforcement action to have violated any provision of this act or any rule, permit or order promulgated pursuant to this act shall be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed the following amounts:

For any violation of any provision of this act, rule, permit or order related to air quality: ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each separate air violation and day of continuing air violation, whichever is greater;

For any violation of any provision of this act, rule, permit or order related to the Idaho national pollutant elimination system program: ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per violation or five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each day of a continuing violation, whichever is greater; or

For any violation of any provision of this act, rule, permit or order related to any other regulatory program authorized by this act: ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per violation or one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each day of a continuing violation, whichever is greater.
The method of recovery of said penalty shall be by a civil enforcement action in the district court in and for the county where the violation occurred. All civil penalties collected under this act shall be paid into the general fund of the state. Parties to an administrative enforcement action may agree to a civil penalty as provided in this subsection.

The imposition or computation of monetary penalties may take into account the seriousness of the violation, good faith efforts to comply with the law, and an enforceable commitment by the person against whom the penalty is directed to implement a supplemental environmental project. For purposes of this section, “supplemental environmental project” means a project which the person is not otherwise required to perform and which prevents pollution, reduces the amount of pollutants reaching the environment, contributes to public awareness of environmental matters or enhances the quality of the environment. In evaluating a particular supplemental environmental project proposal, preference may be given to those projects with an environmental benefit that relate to the violation or the objectives of the underlying statute that was violated or that enhances the quality of the environment in the general geographic location where the violation occurred.

In addition to such civil penalties, any person who has been determined to have violated the provisions of this act or the rules, permits or orders promulgated thereunder shall be liable for any expense incurred by the state in enforcing the act, or in enforcing or terminating any nuisance, source of environmental degradation, cause of sickness or health hazard.

No action taken pursuant to the provisions of this act or of any other environmental protection law shall relieve any person from any civil action and damages that may exist for injury or damage resulting from any violation of this act or of the rules, permits and orders promulgated thereunder.

In addition to, and notwithstanding other provisions of this act, in circumstances of emergency creating conditions of imminent and substantial danger to the public health or environment, the prosecuting attorney or the attorney general may institute a civil action for an immediate injunction to halt any discharge, emission or other activity in violation of provisions of this act or rules, permits and orders promulgated thereunder. In such action the court may issue an ex parte restraining order.

In any administrative or civil enforcement proceeding for violation of any Idaho NPDES program rule, permit, requirement or order, the department shall comply with the public participation requirements set forth in 40 CFR 123.27(d)(2).

§ 39-109. Commencement of civil enforcement actions — Criminal actions authorized — Duties of attorney general.

Upon request of the director, it shall be the duty of the attorney general to institute and prosecute civil enforcement actions or injunctive actions as provided in section 39-108, Idaho Code, and to prosecute actions or proceedings for the enforcement of any criminal provisions of this chapter. In addition, when deemed by the director to be necessary, the director may retain or employ private counsel. The attorney general may delegate the authority and duty under this section to prosecute criminal actions to the prosecuting attorney of the county in which such a criminal action may arise.

§ 39-110. Registration of persons engaged in operations or construction where air pollution is a factor — Reports.

The director may require the registration of persons engaged in operations which may result in air pollution, and of persons causing, permitting or allowing construction of any facility or new equipment capable of emitting air contaminants into the atmosphere, or designed to eliminate or reduce emissions into the atmosphere, and the filing of reports by them with the department relating to locations, size of outlet, height of outlet, rate and period of emission and composition of effluent, and such other information as the director shall prescribe relative to air pollution.

§ 39-111. Availability of records.

Any records or other information furnished to the board, department or to agents, contractors, or other representatives of the department under any provisions of this chapter shall be subject to disclosure according to chapter 1, title 74, Idaho Code.

§ 39-112. Emergency — Order — Hearing — Modification, affirmance, or setting aside.

Any other provision of law to the contrary notwithstanding, if the director finds that a generalized condition of air pollution exists and that it creates an imminent and substantial endangerment to the public health or welfare constituting an emergency requiring immediate action to protect human health or safety, the director, with the concurrence of the governor as to the existence of such an emergency shall order persons causing or contributing to the air pollution to reduce or discontinue immediately the emission of air contaminants, and such order shall fix a time and place, not later than twenty-four (24) hours thereafter, for a hearing to be held before the director. Not more than twenty-four (24) hours after the commencement of such hearing, and without adjournment thereof, the director shall affirm, modify or set aside its order.

In the absence of a generalized condition of air pollution of the type referred to in subsection (1) of this section, if the director finds that emissions from the operation of one (1) or more air contaminant sources is causing imminent and substantial danger to human health or safety the director may bring suit through the attorney general in the appropriate district court to immediately restrain any person causing or contributing to the alleged pollution to stop the emission of air pollutants causing or contributing to such pollution. If it is not practicable to assure prompt protection of public health or welfare or the environment by commencement of such civil action, the director may order the person or persons responsible for the operation or operations in question to reduce or discontinue emissions immediately without regard to other provisions of this act. In such event, the requirements for hearing and affirmance, modification or setting aside of an order set forth in subsection (1) of this section shall apply. For purposes of subsections (1) and (2) of this section, imminent and substantial endangerment or danger shall be interpreted no more broadly than these words are interpreted under section 303 of the clean air act, 42 USC 7603.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit any power which the governor or any other officer may have to declare an emergency and act on the basis of such declaration, if such power is conferred by statute or constitutional provision, or inheres in the office.

§ 39-113. Transfer of employees.

All employees of the division of environmental quality and the INEEL oversight program of the department of health and welfare are transferred to the department of environmental quality. Such transfer shall in no manner affect the rights or privileges of any transferred employee under the public employee retirement system (chapter 13, title 59, Idaho Code), the group insurance plan (chapter 57, title 67, Idaho Code), or personnel system (chapter 53, title 67, Idaho Code). Additionally, when the department of health and welfare is used in terms of environmental protection, it shall mean the department of environmental quality.

§ 39-114. Open burning of crop residue.

The open burning of crop residue to develop physiological conditions conducive to increase crop yields, or to control diseases, insects, pests or weed infestations, shall be an allowable form of open burning, such that it is expressly authorized as referenced in section 52-108, Idaho Code, as long as the open burning is conducted in accordance with the provisions of this section and the rules promulgated pursuant to this chapter.

Crop residue means any vegetative material remaining in the field after harvest or vegetative material produced on designated conservation reserve program (CRP) lands.

The open burning of crop residue shall be conducted in the field where it was generated. A burn may not take place without preapproval from the department. The department shall not approve a burn if it determines that ambient air quality levels:

Are exceeding, or are expected to exceed, ninety percent (90%) of the ozone national ambient air quality standard (NAAQS) and seventy-five percent (75%) of the level of any other NAAQS on any day, and these levels are projected to continue or recur over at least the next twenty-four (24) hours; or

Have reached, or are forecasted to reach and persist at, eighty percent (80%) of the one (1) hour action criteria for particulate matter pursuant to section 556 of IDAPA 58.01.01, rules for the control of air pollution in Idaho.

A fee in an amount of two dollars ($2.00) per acre burned shall be paid to the department. This fee shall not apply to propane flaming, as defined in the rules promulgated pursuant to this chapter. The department shall remit all fees quarterly to the state treasurer, who shall deposit the moneys in the general fund.

The department shall make available to the public, prior to the burn, information regarding the date of the burn, location, acreage and crop type to be burned. If the agricultural community desires to burn more than twenty thousand (20,000) acres annually of bluegrass within the state, that does not include Indian or tribal lands within the reservation boundaries as recognized by the federal clean air act, then, prior to approving the burning of the additional acres, the department shall complete an air quality review analysis to determine that the ambient air quality levels in this section will be met.

§ 39-115. Pollution source permits.

The director shall have the authority to issue pollution source permits in compliance with rules established hereunder.
(1)(a) The director shall have the authority to issue pollution source permits in compliance with rules established hereunder.

To determine the applicability of permit requirements for any major or minor air pollution source in Idaho, the department shall develop and recommend to the board for adoption, rules that define “regulated air pollutant” as follows:

For purposes of a major source permit to operate issued or modified by the department in accordance with title V of the federal clean air act amendments of 1990, “regulated air pollutant” shall have the same meaning as in title V of the federal clean air act amendments of 1990, and any applicable federal regulations promulgated pursuant to title V of the federal clean air act amendments of 1990;

For purposes of any other operating permit issued or modified by the department, the federal definition of “regulated air pollutant” as defined in subsection (1)(b)(i) of this section shall also apply;

For purposes of any permit to construct issued or modified by the department pursuant to part D of subchapter I of the federal clean air act, “regulated air pollutant” shall mean those air contaminants that are regulated pursuant to part D of subchapter I of the federal clean air act and applicable federal regulations promulgated pursuant to part D of subchapter I of the federal clean air act; and

For purposes of major source compliance with 42 U.S.C. section 7412(g) and (i)(1), “regulated air pollutant” shall mean those air contaminants that are listed pursuant to 42 U.S.C. section 7412(b); and

For purposes of any other major or minor permit to construct issued or modified by the department, “regulated air pollutant” shall mean those air contaminants that are regulated pursuant to part C of subchapter I of the federal clean air act and any applicable federal regulations promulgated pursuant to part C of subchapter I of the federal clean air act.

To determine the applicability of any permit to construct or permit to operate requirement to any air pollution source in Idaho, fugitive emissions shall not be included in any applicability calculation, unless required by 42 U.S.C. section 7401 et seq. or any implementing regulation promulgated thereunder. The director shall develop and the board shall adopt rules that provide that, for both major and minor source permit applicability determinations, fugitive emissions shall be included only as required by 42 U.S.C. section 7401 et seq. or any implementing regulation promulgated thereunder.

The director shall develop and recommend to the board for adoption through rulemaking, criteria to determine insignificant activities and such sources or modification with emissions at or below the de minimis level which shall not require either a permit to construct or a permit to operate; provided however, that a registration of the activities or sources may be required.

The director shall have the authority to sue in competent courts to enjoin any threatened or continuing:

Violations of pollution source permits or conditions thereof without the necessity of a prior revocation of the permit; or

Construction of an industrial or commercial air pollution source without a permit required under this chapter or rules adopted hereunder.
(3) The department is authorized to charge and collect a fee for processing applications for industrial or commercial air pollution source permits in accordance with a fee schedule established by the board pursuant to this chapter. For fees charged for operating permits under title V of the federal clean air act amendments of 1990, the department shall not charge a fee on any hazardous air pollutant other than those listed under section 112 of the federal clean air act. The fee schedule shall be structured to provide an incentive for emission reduction.

The department is authorized to charge and collect a fee for processing applications for industrial or commercial air pollution source permits in accordance with a fee schedule established by the board pursuant to this chapter. For fees charged for operating permits under title V of the federal clean air act amendments of 1990, the department shall not charge a fee on any hazardous air pollutant other than those listed under section 112 of the federal clean air act. The fee schedule shall be structured to provide an incentive for emission reduction.

The director may issue air emission source permits to construct a facility to incinerate any waste or waste item contaminated with polychlorinated biphenyls (PCBs) only if the director finds:

The facility will not be sited in complex valley terrain where the valley floor is less than five (5) miles wide and the valley walls rise more than one thousand (1,000) feet;

The facility has complied with local planning and zoning requirements;

There has been an opportunity for public participation; and

The facility will employ best available technology and instrumentation.

Subsection (4) of this section shall not apply to incineration activities existing on or before January 1, 1987.

§ 39-116. Compliance schedules.

The director shall have the authority to issue compliance schedule orders to any person who is the source of any health hazard, air contaminant, water pollution or solid waste for which regulatory standards have been established, including regulatory standards then in effect or to become effective at a future date or at future successive dates. The purpose of any compliance schedule order shall be to identify and establish appropriate acts and time schedules for interim actions by those persons who are or who will be affected by regulatory standards, such acts and schedules being designed to assure timely compliance by those affected by the regulatory standards. Prior to the issuance of a compliance schedule order, the director shall solicit the cooperation of the person to whom the compliance schedule order will be directed by providing the person notice that identifies with reasonable specificity the applicable statutes and rules, the events or occurrences that necessitate the order, and the proposed terms of the order and that informs the person that a conference with the director to discuss the proposed terms of the order shall be provided if requested within fifteen (15) days of receipt of the notice. If requested, the director shall confer with the person and shall solicit the person’s cooperation in the selection of the terms of the order. The compliance schedule order may be issued at any time after the conference, if one is requested, and the expiration of sixty (60) days following the receipt of the notice. Any compliance schedule order shall be enforceable in the same manner as any order entered pursuant to section 39-108, Idaho Code, except the order may be challenged by an administrative appeal to the board as provided in section 39-107(5), Idaho Code. The order shall be effective and enforceable during an administrative appeal, unless the board or its designated hearing officer issues a stay of the order.

§ 39-116A. Compliance agreement schedules.

The director is hereby authorized to enter into a compliance agreement schedule with any person. An agreement entered into under this section shall not relieve any person from the obligation to comply with applicable human health and environmental protection statutes and rules, but may include an enforceable schedule for actions necessary for the person to come into or maintain compliance as expeditiously as practicable with such statutes and rules, if the person demonstrates to the satisfaction of the department that such a schedule is appropriate, given the factors listed in subsection (4) of this section. The provisions of this section shall not apply where prohibited by federal or state law.

The department may propose, and the board adopt, rules necessary for the implementation of this section.

In establishing any compliance agreement schedule, the term of the agreement shall not exceed ten (10) years, although successive agreements may be entered into. Agreements shall provide for annual meetings between the department and the person to reassess whether, considering the factors listed in subsection (4) of this section, the schedule and other terms of the agreement are still appropriate. All agreements must be signed by the director or his designee and an authorized representative on behalf of the person. All agreements are enforceable as orders under the provisions of this chapter.

Agreements and schedules entered into under this act shall take into account, in descending priority the:

Protection of public health;

Protection of environment;

Ability of the person to pay for costs of compliance;

Current fiscal obligations of the person;

Other factors as determined by the department or the board.

§ 39-116B. Vehicle inspection and maintenance program.

The board shall initiate rulemaking to provide for the implementation of a motor vehicle inspection and maintenance program to regulate and ensure control of the air pollutants and emissions from registered motor vehicles in an attainment or unclassified area as designated by the United States environmental protection agency, not otherwise exempted in subsection (7) of this section, if the director determines the following conditions are met:

An airshed, as defined by the department, within a metropolitan statistical area, as defined by the United States office of management and budget, has ambient concentration design values equal to or above eighty-five percent (85%) of a national ambient air quality standard, as defined by the United States environmental protection agency, for three (3) consecutive years starting with the 2005 design value; and

The department determines air pollutants from motor vehicles constitute one (1) of the top two (2) emission sources contributing to the design value of eighty-five percent (85%).

In the event both of the conditions in subsection (1) of this section are met, the board shall establish by rule minimum standards for an inspection and maintenance program for registered motor vehicles, not otherwise exempted in subsection (7) of this section, which shall provide for:

Counties and cities within the airshed that will be subject to the motor vehicle inspection and maintenance program;

The requirements for licensing authorized inspection stations and technicians;

The frequency with which inspections shall be required, provided that inspections shall occur no more than once every two (2) years;

The procedures under which authorized inspection stations and technicians inspect motor vehicles and issue evidence of compliance;

The criteria under which it is to be determined that a motor vehicle is eligible for a certificate of compliance;

The parameters and diagnostic equipment necessary to perform the required inspection. The rules shall ensure that the equipment complies with any applicable standards of the United States environmental protection agency;

A fee, bond or insurance which is necessary to carry out the provisions of this section and to fund an air quality public awareness and outreach program. The fee for a motor vehicle inspection shall not exceed twenty dollars ($20.00) per vehicle;

The issuance of a pamphlet for distribution to owners of motor vehicles explaining the reasons for and the methods of the inspections; and

The granting of a waiver from the minimum standards as provided by rule, which may be based on model year, fuel, size, or other factors, which shall include, but not be limited to, a repair waiver and a hardship waiver.

In the event both of the conditions in subsection (1) of this section are met, the director shall attempt to enter into a joint exercise of powers agreement under sections 67-2326 through 67-2333, Idaho Code, with the board of county commissioners of each county within the airshed in which a motor vehicle inspection and maintenance program is required under this section, and the councils of incorporated cities within those counties, to develop a standardized inspection and maintenance program. If the board of county commissioners or the councils of incorporated cities within those counties choose not to enter into a joint exercise of powers agreement with the director, then within one hundred twenty (120) days of the director’s written request to enter into such an agreement, the board of county commissioners or the councils of incorporated cities may notify the department that it will implement an alternative motor vehicle emission control strategy that will result in emissions reductions equivalent to that of a vehicle emission inspection program. If the department determines the emissions reductions of the alternative motor vehicle emission control strategy are not equivalent, or no equivalent reductions are proposed, the department or its designee shall implement the motor vehicle inspection and maintenance program required pursuant to the provisions of this section.
(4) The Idaho transportation department shall revoke the registration of any motor vehicle identified by the department or its designee, or any city or county administering a program established under the provisions of this section as having failed to comply with such motor vehicle inspection and maintenance program, except that no vehicle shall be identified to the Idaho transportation department unless:

The Idaho transportation department shall revoke the registration of any motor vehicle identified by the department or its designee, or any city or county administering a program established under the provisions of this section as having failed to comply with such motor vehicle inspection and maintenance program, except that no vehicle shall be identified to the Idaho transportation department unless:

The department or its designee, or the city or county certifies to the Idaho transportation department that the owner of the motor vehicle has been given notice and had the opportunity for a hearing concerning the program and has exhausted all remedies and appeals from any determination made at such hearing; and

The department or its designee, or the city or county reimburses the Idaho transportation department for all direct costs associated with the registration revocation procedure.

The department shall annually review the results of the vehicle inspection and maintenance program. The review shall include, among other things, an estimate of the emission reduction obtained from the number of vehicles that initially fail the test and then pass after maintenance.

Every five (5) years beginning in 2013, the director shall review the air quality data and make recommendations to the legislature for its determination whether a program initially established pursuant to the provisions of this section should be continued, modified or terminated.

Electric or hybrid motor vehicles, new motor vehicles less than five (5) years old, classic automobiles, motorized farm equipment and registered motor vehicles engaged solely in the business of agriculture, shall be exempt from any motor vehicle inspection and maintenance program established pursuant to the provisions of this section.

Any vehicle registration that has been revoked pursuant to the provisions of this section that is found to be in compliance with current emissions standards shall have the registration reinstated without charge.